Tennessee, session 114, HB2321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-203(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The report may be submitted to the commissioner electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2321
012276
- 1 -